test/src/morphology/adj-es_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

#Adjektives on -es. Adjectives from lexicon GIMES, LINES, SÁDNES, TJIEGOS, AHTES, SUVRES, OAMES, SJÆVNNJAT, LEXATTR

Tests:
  Adjective - dimes: # GIMES and LINES
    dimes+A+Attr: dibma
    dimes+A+Sg+Nom: dimes
    dimes+A+Sg+Acc: [dibmasav, dibmásav]
    dimes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dibmasabbo, dibmasabbo]
    dimes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dibmasamos, dibmásamos]
    dimes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [dibmasappot, dibmásappot]
    dimes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [dibmasabmusit, dibmásabmusit]
    dimes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [dibmasappusj, dibmásappusj]
    dimes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [dibmasapputjit, dibmásapputjit]
    dimes+A+Der/at+Adv: [dibmasit, dibmásit]
    dimes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: dibmavuohta

  Adjective - snáves: # LUOBES
    snáves+A+Attr: snáves
    snáves+A+Sg+Nom: snáves
    snáves+A+Sg+Acc: [snávvásav, snávvasav]
    snáves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [snávvásabbo, snávvasabbo]
    snáves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [snávvasamos, snávvásamos]
    snáves+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [snávvasappot, snávvásappot]
    snáves+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [snávvasabmusit, snávvásabmusit]
    snáves+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [snávvasappusj, snávvásappusj]
    snáves+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [snávvasapputjit, snávvásapputjit]
    snáves+A+Der/at+Adv: [snávvasit, snávvásit]
    snáves+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: snávesvuohta

  Adjective - sádnes: # SÁDNES
    sádnes+A+Attr: sádnes
    sádnes+A+Sg+Nom: sádnes
    sádnes+A+Sg+Ine: sáddnán
    sádnes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sáddnáp
    sádnes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sáddnámus
    sádnes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: sáddnábut
    sádnes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: sáddnámusát
    sádnes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: sáddnábusj
    sádnes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: sáddnábuttjat
    sádnes+A+Der/at+Adv: sáddnát
    sádnes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: sádnesvuohta

  Adjective - tjoaskes: # TJIEGOS
    tjoaskes+A+Attr: tjoaskes 
    tjoaskes+A+Sg+Nom: tjoaskes 
    tjoaskes+A+Sg+Com: tjoasskásijn 
    tjoaskes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásabbo
    tjoaskes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásamos
    tjoaskes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: tjoasskásappot
    tjoaskes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: tjoasskásabmusit
    tjoaskes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásappusj
    tjoaskes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: tjoasskásapputjit
    tjoaskes+A+Der/at+Adv: tjoasskásit
    tjoaskes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: tjoaskesvuohta

  Adjective - vijdes: # TJIEGOS
    vijdes+A+Attr: vijdes 
    vijdes+A+Sg+Nom: vijdes
    vijdes+A+Sg+Gen: vijddása
    vijdes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vijddásabbo
    vijdes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vijddásamos

  Adjective - vájves: # TJIEGOS
    vájves+A+Attr: vájves
    vájves+A+Sg+Nom: vájves
    vájves+A+Sg+Gen: vájvvása
    vájves+A+Sg+Acc: vájvvásav
    vájves+A+Sg+Ill: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Sg+Ine: vájvvásin
    vájves+A+Sg+Ela: vájvvásis
    vájves+A+Sg+Com: vájvvásijn
    vájves+A+Pl+Nom: vájvvása
    vájves+A+Pl+Gen: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Pl+Acc: vájvvásijt
    vájves+A+Pl+Ill: vájvvásijda
    vájves+A+Pl+Ine: vájvvásijn
    vájves+A+Pl+Ela: vájvvásijs
    vájves+A+Pl+Com: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Ess: vájvvásin
    vájves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vájvvásabbo
    vájves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vájvvásamos

  Adjective - dåhkkimahtes: # AHTES and LEXATTR
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Attr: dåhkkimahtes
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: []
    dåhkkimahtes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: dåhkkimahtesvuohta

  Adjective - suvres: # SUVRES and LINES
    suvres+A+Attr: suvra
    suvres+A+Sg+Nom: suvres
    suvres+A+Sg+Gen: [suvrrá, suvrrása]
    suvres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: suvrráp
    suvres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: suvrrámus
    suvres+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: suvrrábut
    suvres+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: suvrrámusát
    suvres+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: suvrrábusj
    suvres+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: suvrrábuttjat
    suvres+A+Der/at+Adv: suvrrát
    suvres+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: suvravuohta

  Adjective - goastes: # OAMES
    goastes+A+Attr: goasste 
    goastes+A+Sg+Nom: goastes
    goastes+A+Sg+Gen: goasstása
    goastes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: goasstásabbo
    goastes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: goasstásamos
    goastes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: goasstásappot
    goastes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: goasstásabmusit
    goastes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: goasstásappusj
    goastes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: goasstásapputjit
    goastes+A+Der/at+Adv: goasstásit
    goastes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: goasstevuohta

  Adjective - luobes: # 
    luobes+A+Attr: luobes 
    luobes+A+Sg+Nom: luobes
    luobes+A+Sg+Acc: luohpasav
    luobes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: luohpasabbo
    luobes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: luohpasamos

  Adjective - gimes: # GIMES
    gimes+A+Attr: gibma 
    gimes+A+Sg+Nom: gimes
    gimes+A+Sg+Acc: gibmasav
    gimes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gibmasabbo
    gimes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gibmasamos

  Adjective - rávdes: # SJÆVNNJAT
    rávdes+A+Attr: []
    rávdes+A+Sg+Nom: rávdes
    rávdes+A+Sg+Gen: rávddása
    rávdes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: rávddásabbo
    rávdes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rávddásamos
    rávdes+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: rávddásappot
    rávdes+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: rávddásabmusit
    rávdes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: rávddásappusj
    rávdes+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: rávddásapputjit
    rávdes+A+Der/at+Adv: rávddásit
    rávdes+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - vánes: # LEXATTR and DIMES
    vánes+A+Attr: [vánes, vádna]
    vánes+A+Sg+Nom: vánes
    vánes+A+Sg+Gen: vádnása
    vánes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vádnásabbo
    vánes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vádnásamos
